Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.468

Report of sale.

"Report of sale" means a document or electronic record transaction that when properly completed and filed protects the seller of a vehicle from certain criminal and civil liabilities arising from use of the vehicle by another person after the vehicle has been sold or a change in ownership has occurred.

[ 2010 c 161 s 136.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.